Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2514XC (1) 91 ss/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 542B.14, subsection 1, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (4) Successfully passing examinations designed to determine 3 the proficiency and qualifications to engage in the practice of 4 land surveying , which shall include an examination on subjects 5 specific to the practice of land surveying in this state . 6